Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-414
Officer of consolidated counties; duties.

An officer of consolidated counties shall have the same duties and responsibilities provided by law for the same office in a single county.

Laws 1969, c. 139, § 7, p. 640.